Washington statutes.
RCW 36.102.110

Property acquisition and sale.

A public stadium authority may acquire and transfer real and personal property by lease, sublease, purchase, or sale.

[ 1997 c 220 s 110 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997).]